District of Columbia statutes.
31-5112

Administrative or judicial review of orders or actions.

Any insurance company, agent, solicitor, or broker aggrieved by any order or action of the Commissioner under this chapter may contest the validity of such order or action by appeal or through any other appropriate proceeding, in accordance with the procedures prescribed by §§ 31-2502.43 [repealed] and 31-2502.44 [repealed]; provided, that any such insurance company, agent, solicitor, or broker, which is licensed in the District under Subdivision A of Subtitle VI of this title, may contest the validity of such order or action by appeal or through any other appropriate proceeding in accordance with the procedures prescribed by Subdivision A of Subtitle VI of this title.

Sept. 25, 1962, 76 Stat. 585, Pub. L. 87-686, § 12
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(m), 44 DCR 1730
1981 Ed., § 35-1012.
1973 Ed., § 35-1612.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5102.